Illinois, session 104th, HB3917.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the General 8Revenue Fund to the Department of Veterans' Affairs:9CENTRAL OFFICE10  For Personal Services.............................7,804,90011  For State Contributions to Social12   Security...........................................597,10013  For Operational Expenses of Central Office, 14   including prior years' costs.....................4,947,30015  For Expenses Related to the Security and Safety16   Enhancements at Illinois Veterans' Homes.........1,250,00017  For Expenses Related to the Agency's Diversity, Equity,18    Inclusion, and Accessibility Initiatives..........500,00019    Total                                         $15,099,300 20    Section 5. The sum of $1,096,200, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 22the Department of Veterans' Affairs for all costs associated   HB3917- 2 -OMB104 00051 HML 10051 b1with the Veterans' Accountability Unit. 2    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 3thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the General 4Revenue Fund to the Department of Veterans' Affairs for the 5objects and purposes and in the amounts set forth as follows:6GRANTS-IN-AID7  For Warrior Assistance Program......................250,0008  For Bonus Payments to War Veterans and Peacetime9   Crisis Survivors...................................198,00010  For Providing Educational Opportunities for11   Children of Certain Veterans, as provided12   by law, including Prior Years' Claims..............500,00013  For Cartage and Erection of Veterans' Headstones,14    including Prior Years' Claims.....................425,00015    Total                                          $1,373,000 16    Section 15. The sum of $3,500,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 18Fund to the Department of Veterans' Affairs for the payment of 19scholarships to students who are dependents of Illinois 20resident military personnel declared to be prisoners of war, 21missing in action, killed or permanently disabled, as provided 22by law. 23    Section 20. The amount of $16,830,900, or so much thereof   HB3917- 3 -OMB104 00051 HML 10051 b1as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 2Fund to the Department of Veterans' Affairs for costs 3associated with the Illinois Veterans' Home at Chicago, 4including prior years' costs. 5    Section 25. The amount of $6,000,000, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 7Veterans' Homes Fund to the Department of Veterans' Affairs 8for costs associated with the Illinois Veterans' Home at 9Chicago, including prior years' costs. 10    Section 30. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 11as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 12Veterans Assistance Fund to the Department of Veterans' 13Affairs for making grants, funding additional services, or 14conducting additional research projects relating to veterans' 15post traumatic stress disorder; veterans' homelessness; the 16health insurance cost of veterans; veterans' disability 17benefits, including but not limited to, disability benefits 18provided by veterans service organizations and veterans 19assistance commissions or centers; and the long-term care of 20veterans. 21    Section 35. The amount of $1,641,865, or so much thereof 22as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 23business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation heretofore   HB3917- 4 -OMB104 00051 HML 10051 b1made for such purpose in Article 75, Section 35 of Public Act 2103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Illinois 3Veterans Assistance Fund to the Department of Veterans' 4Affairs for making grants, funding additional services, or 5conducting additional research projects relating to veterans' 6post traumatic stress disorder; veterans' homelessness; the 7health insurance cost of veterans; veterans' disability 8benefits, including but not limited to, disability benefits 9provided by veterans service organizations and veterans 10assistance commissions or centers; and the long-term care of 11veterans. 12    Section 40. The following named amount, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 14Affordable Housing Trust Fund to the Department of Veterans' 15Affairs for the object and purpose and in the amount set forth 16as follows:17  For Specially Adapted Housing for Veterans..........240,000 18    Section 45. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Military 20Family Relief Fund to the Department of Veterans' Affairs for 21the payment of benefits authorized under the Survivors 22Compensation Act. 23    Section 50. The following named amounts, or so much   HB3917- 5 -OMB104 00051 HML 10051 b1thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 2the Department of Veterans' Affairs for objects and purposes 3hereinafter named:4VETERANS' FIELD SERVICES5Payable from the General Revenue Fund:6  For Personal Services.............................5,559,2007  For State Contributions to Social8   Security...........................................425,3009  For Operational Expenses of Veterans' Field 10   Services, including prior years' costs...........2,201,90011    Total                                          $8,186,400 12    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much 13thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 14the Department of Veterans' Affairs for the objects and 15purposes hereinafter named:16ILLINOIS VETERANS' HOME AT ANNA17Payable from General Revenue Fund:18  For Personal Services.............................6,343,10019  For State Contributions to20   Social Security....................................486,30021  For Operational Expenses of Anna Veterans' Home,22   including prior years' costs.....................2,312,00023    Total                                          $9,141,40024Payable from Anna Veterans Home Fund:25  For Personal Services...............................413,100  HB3917- 6 -OMB104 00051 HML 10051 b1  For State Contributions to the State2   Employees' Retirement System.......................192,1003  For State Contributions to4   Social Security.....................................31,7005  For Operational Expenses of Anna Veterans' Home,6   including prior years' costs.....................2,300,0007  For Permanent Improvements...........................10,0008  For Refunds..........................................30,0009    Total                                          $2,976,900 10    Section 60. The following named amounts, or so much 11thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 12the Department of Veterans' Affairs for the objects and 13purposes hereinafter named:14ILLINOIS VETERANS' HOME AT QUINCY15Payable from General Revenue Fund:16  For Personal Services............................32,944,70017  For State Contributions to18   Social Security..................................2,496,90019  For Operational Expenses of Quincy Veterans' Home,20   including prior years' costs....................10,075,80021    Total                                         $45,517,40022Payable from Quincy Veterans Home Fund:23  For Personal Services............................11,239,70024  For Member Compensation..............................28,00025  For State Contributions to the State  HB3917- 7 -OMB104 00051 HML 10051 b1   Employees' Retirement System.....................5,224,9002  For State Contributions to3   Social Security....................................859,9004  For Operational Expenses of Quincy Veterans' Home,5   including prior years' costs....................11,928,3006  For Permanent Improvements..........................640,0007  For Refunds..........................................70,0008    Total                                         $29,990,800 9    Section 65. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 11the Department of Veterans' Affairs for the objects and 12purposes hereinafter named:13ILLINOIS VETERANS' HOME AT LASALLE14Payable from General Revenue Fund:15  For Personal Services............................12,596,80016  For State Contributions to Social Security........1,056,40017  For Operational Expenses of LaSalle Veterans' Home,18   including prior years' costs.....................4,045,10019    Total                                         $17,698,30020Payable from LaSalle Veterans Home Fund:21  For Personal Services.............................4,975,10022  For State Contributions to the State23   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,312,80024  For State Contributions to25   Social Security....................................380,600  HB3917- 8 -OMB104 00051 HML 10051 b1  For Operational Expenses of LaSalle Veterans' Home,2   including prior years' costs.....................1,355,5003  For Permanent Improvements..........................115,1004  For Refunds..........................................30,8005    Total                                          $9,169,900 6    Section 70. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 8the Department of Veterans' Affairs for the objects and 9purposes hereinafter named:10ILLINOIS VETERANS' HOME AT MANTENO11Payable from General Revenue Fund:12  For Personal Services............................27,142,50013  For State Contributions to14   Social Security..................................2,393,30015  For Operational Expenses of Manteno Veterans' Home,16   including prior years' costs....................10,513,10017    Total                                         $40,048,90018Payable from Manteno Veterans Home Fund:19  For Personal Services.............................9,539,50020  For Member Compensation...............................5,00021  For State Contributions to the State22   Employees' Retirement System.....................4,434,60023  For State Contributions to24   Social Security....................................729,80025  For Operational Expenses of Manteno Veterans' Home,  HB3917- 9 -OMB104 00051 HML 10051 b1   including prior years' costs.....................3,592,1002  For Permanent Improvements..........................350,0003  For Refunds.........................................100,0004    Total                                         $18,751,000 5    Section 75. The following named amounts, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 7the Department of Veterans' Affairs for costs associated with 8the operation of a program for homeless veterans at the 9Illinois Veterans' Home at Manteno:10  Payable from General Revenue Fund...................968,80011    Payable from the Manteno Veterans12    Home Fund.........................................201,50013    Total                                          $1,170,300 14    Section 80. The following named amounts, or so much 15thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 16the Department of Veterans' Affairs for the objects and 17purposes hereinafter named:18STATE APPROVING AGENCY19Payable from GI Education Fund:20  For Operational Expenses of the State Approving Agency,21   including prior years' costs.....................2,691,40022    Total                                          $2,691,400 23    Section 85. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof as   HB3917- 10 -OMB104 00051 HML 10051 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the Folds Of Honor 2Foundation Fund to the Department of Veterans' Affairs for 3grants to aid in providing educational scholarships to 4military families. 5    Section 90. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 7business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore 8made for such purpose in Article 75, Section 100 of Public Act 9103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the General 10Revenue Fund to the Department of Veterans' Affairs for costs 11associated with dental care for veterans in the five state-run 12veterans' homes. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142025.